Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-602
Dogs owned by different persons; joint liability.

If two or more dogs owned by different persons shall kill, wound, chase or worry any sheep or other domestic animal, such persons shall be jointly and severally liable for all damage done by such dogs.

Laws 1877, § 2, p. 156;

R.S.1913, § 173;

C.S.1922, § 170;

C.S.1929, § 54-602;

R.S.1943, § 54-602.